Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 2. Reports, Investigations andHearings
§ 37-2-209.
Plea of self-incrimination unavailable; use of testimony in criminal prosecution prohibited; exception.

No person shall be excused from testifying or from producing books, accounts and papers in any investigation or inquiry by or hearing before the commission or any commissioner, when ordered so to do, based upon or growing out of any violation of the provisions of this act, on the ground or for the reason that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to penalty or forfeiture but no person having so testified shall be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter or thing concerning which he may have testified or produced any documentary evidence; provided, that no person so testifying shall be exempt from prosecution or punishment for perjury in so testifying.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 49; C.S. 1920, § 5501; R.S. 1931, § 94-149; C.S. 1945, § 64-308; W.S. 1957, § 37-35.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision relating to self-incrimination, see art. 1, § 11, Wyo. Const.

As to perjury generally, see §§

6-5-301

to

6-5-307

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note at §

37-2-110

.

Cited

in

Hall v. State, 851 P.2d 1262,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1993).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Immunity and the Grand Jury,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 629 (1973).

§ 37-2-210.
Depositions; rules as to hearings and investigations.

The commission, or with the consent of the commission, any party to the proceedings before the commission, may, in any investigation, cause the depositions of witnesses residing within or without the state to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for like depositions in civil actions in the courts of this state. All hearings and investigations before the commission shall be conducted under such rules as the commission may prescribe and adopt.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 50; C.S. 1920, § 5502; R.S. 1931, § 94-150; C.S. 1945, § 64-309; W.S. 1957, § 37-36.

Cross references. —

As to rules of civil procedure governing depositions, see Rule 26 et seq., W.R.C.P.

Cited

in

Application of Chicago & N. W. R.R., 79 Wyo. 343, 334 P.2d 519,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1959).

§ 37-2-211.
Minutes of hearings; parties entitled to transcripts.

The minutes of all hearings had before or by the commission shall be kept, and shall include the names of all persons who appear and witnesses who are sworn, with the identification of any documentary evidence produced. Parties to any proceeding before the commission shall be entitled to transcripts of the testimony taken in such proceedings, subject to such reasonable rulings and regulations as the commission may prescribe.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 51; C.S. 1920, § 5503; R.S. 1931, § 94-151; C.S. 1945, § 64-310; W.S. 1957, § 37-37.

§ 37-2-212.
Orders to be in writing; opinions to be published.

Every order of the commission shall be in writing and in cases of importance may be accompanied by an opinion setting forth in brief the facts on which the commission has based its order. The commission shall provide for the publication from time to time and for the assembling of its opinions and orders.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 52; C.S. 1920, § 5504; R.S. 1931, § 94-152; C.S. 1945, § 64-311; W.S. 1957, § 37-38.

Legislative purpose. —

Purpose of requiring well-articulated findings and conclusions is to provide a rational basis for judicial review. Williston Basin Interstate Pipeline Co. v. Wyoming PSC, 996 P.2d 663,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2000).

Record of commission must be complete. —

It is essential that the report of the commission, or the record, in some way disclose precisely the elements involved and the processes and methods by which the commission reaches its findings and conclusions on the evidence, because it is essential that the parties have the information to determine whether further proceedings should be had and how they should be conducted, also if the supreme court is to determine whether or not the “findings” are reasonable and proper, it must have definite and specific findings to consider, and be able to determine from the report what evidence the commission considered credible, and therefore worthy of adoption, and what evidence it rejected. Svilar Light & Power v. Riverton Valley Elec. Ass'n, 355 P.2d 52,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1960).

§ 37-2-213.
Orders effective within 30 days; notice to parties; amendment or annulment of order.

Unless a different time is prescribed by the commission, every order of the commission shall be effective within thirty (30) days after the service thereof. Straightway after the entry of record of any order of the commission, notice thereof shall be given to every party required to obey the order. At any time after the entry thereof the commission in the manner provided for the making thereof may alter, amend, annul or otherwise modify any order.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 53; C.S. 1920, § 5505; R.S. 1931, § 94-153; C.S. 1945, § 64-312; W.S. 1957, § 37-39.

Applied

in

In re Hamilton Pipe Line Co., 65 Wyo. 350, 202 P.2d 184,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1949); Big Horn Rural Elec. Co. v. Pacific Power & Light Co., 397 P.2d 455,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1964).

§ 37-2-214.
Rehearing.

At any time after an order has been made by the commission any person interested therein may apply for a rehearing in respect to any matter determined therein and the commission shall grant and hold a rehearing if in its judgment sufficient reason therefor be made to appear, which rehearing shall be subject to rules as the commission may prescribe. Applications for rehearing shall stay the effect of any order or decision of the commission only as to the portion of the order addressed in the rehearing application until the commission denies the application or enters an order following rehearing, whichever last occurs, provided, however, that upon the request of any party and a showing of good cause therefor, the commission may vacate the stay and allow the order or decision to remain in effect. An order or decision made after the rehearing vacating, amending or modifying the original order or decision shall not, as to the matter considered on rehearing, be open to a further application for rehearing, and shall have the same force and effect as the original order or decision.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 54; C.S. 1920, § 5506; R.S. 1931, § 94-154; C.S. 1945, § 64-313; W.S. 1957, § 37-40; Laws 2005, ch. 101, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the second sentence, to change provisions pertaining to staying an order, and made stylistic changes throughout.

Section is permissive and not mandatory. —

This section, in providing that any person interested “may apply for a rehearing,” is permissive and not mandatory, and an application for a rehearing by the commission is not required before there can be an appeal to the district court. Appeal of Hamilton Pipe Line Co., 65 Wyo. 350, 202 P.2d 184,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1949).

Presentation of new evidence not required. —

This section does not require that new evidence be presented. A rehearing may be had if, in the judgment of the commission, “sufficient reason therefor be made to appear.” A rehearing may be proper whether or not new evidence is contemplated. Vandehei Developers v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 790 P.2d 1282,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1990).

Rehearing denied where new evidence relates to mere “possibility.”—

The commission did not err in determining that public convenience and necessity would be best served by authorizing a public utility to serve the entire plant located on the boundary of the certificated area of another utility. Further, an abuse of discretion did not occur in the refusal by the commission to rehear this matter, the newly discovered evidence upon which the unsuccessful utility contended for a rehearing consisting of newspaper clippings relating to a “possible” expansion of the plant, and not to a present intent to expand the plant. Utah Power & Light Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 713 P.2d 240,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 463

(Wyo. 1986).

Quoted

in

Hupp v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 715 P.2d 223,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 500

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 37-2-215.
Prosecution of violations.

Whenever the commission shall be of the opinion that any public utility is failing or omitting, or is about to fail or omit to do anything required of it by this act, or by any order of the commission, or is doing anything or is about to do anything or permit anything to be done contrary to or in violation of the provisions of this act, or of any order of the commission, it may begin and prosecute in any district court of this state an appropriate action in law or in equity to remedy or to prevent such real or proposed violation.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 55; C.S. 1920, § 5507; R.S. 1931, § 94-155; C.S. 1945, § 64-314; W.S. 1957, § 37-41; 1995, ch. 192, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to order of commission to prevent violations of laws or regulations, see §

37-2-120

.

As to liability of utility for loss or damage caused by violations of laws or orders of commission, see §

37-12-208

.

As to penalties for violations by utilities, see §§

37-12-211

,

37-12-212

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note at §

37-2-110

.

§ 37-2-216.
Venue.

All provisions of the law of this state relating to venue shall apply to proceedings under this act, and in addition any action at law or in equity to enforce the provisions of this act, or of any order of the commission, or to prevent any proposed violation thereof, may be commenced in the district court in and for the county in which the principal office of the commission is located or in the county where the principal office in the state of the public utility is located.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 56; C.S. 1920, § 5508; R.S. 1931, § 94-156; C.S. 1945, § 64-315; W.S. 1957, § 37-42.

Cross references. —

As to venue generally, see §§

1-5-101

to

1-5-109

.

For procedure relating to transfer of trials, see Rule 40.1, W.R.C.P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note at §

37-2-110

.

§ 37-2-217.
Jurisdiction.

All provisions of the laws of this state prescribing the duties and jurisdiction of the courts thereof shall apply to this act, and in addition it shall be the duty of the district court of the county in which the commission has its principal office to entertain and determine all actions commenced under the provisions of this act, or of any order of the commission by mandamus, or by injunctions, or by any other appropriate remedy.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 57; C.S. 1920, § 5509; R.S. 1931, § 94-157; C.S. 1945, § 64-316; W.S. 1957, § 37-43.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions relating to the judiciary, see art. 5, Wyo. Const.

As to injunctions generally, see §

1-28-101

et seq. and Rule 65, W.R.C.P.

As to mandamus generally, see §

1-30-101

et seq.

For provisions relating to courts generally, see title 5.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note at §

37-2-110

.

Applied

in

In re Hamilton Pipe Line Co., 65 Wyo. 350, 202 P.2d 184,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1949).

§ 37-2-218.
Refund of excess charges.

Whenever any public utility shall charge, collect or receive any rate or rates in excess of the rates fixed in the schedule of charges then in force, as provided in this act, it shall be the duty of such public utility straightway to refund to the person paying such excessive rates the difference between the lawful rates fixed in such schedule and the rates so charged, collected or received.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 58; C.S. 1920, § 5510; R.S. 1931, § 94-158; C.S. 1945, § 64-317; W.S. 1957, § 37-44.

Cross references. —

As to rates generally, see chapter 3 of this title.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. For disposition of ch. 146, Laws 1915, in this compilation, see Table of Disposition of Acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Joinder or representation of several claimants in action to recover overcharge, 1 ALR2d 160.

Right of customers of public utility with respect to fund representing a refund from another supplying utility upon reduction of latter's rates, 18 ALR2d 1343.

Public service commission's implied authority to order refund of public utility revenues, 41 ALR5th 783.

§ 37-2-219.
Who may appeal commission decision or action; manner and extent of appeal.

Any party in interest or any person or party authorized under W.S.

37-2-118

, to file an original complaint before the commission, may appeal from a final decision or other commission action or inaction, in the same manner, and to the same extent, as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 59; C.S. 1920, § 5511; R.S. 1931, § 94-159; Laws 1933, ch. 119, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 64-318; W.S. 1957, § 37-45; Laws 1971, ch. 135, § 1; 2007, ch. 215, § 1.

The 2007 amendment

substituted “W.S.

37-2-118

” for “section 37-17, Wyoming Statutes 1957.”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2007.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

see §§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Legislative intent in requiring answer to petition. —

In requiring in this section a summons to be issued directing an answer to be filed within thirty days after service, the legislature had in mind were particularly cases where the points to be determined by the district court are whether the commission was acting without or in excess of its powers or whether an order was procured by fraud. Where those matters are involved, the petition of appeal might well be in such form as to require an answer to explain or deny the facts pleaded. But where the points raised were whether the order of the commission was in conformity with law and whether the issuable facts found were “supported by substantial evidence,” a petition of appeal was not subject to dismissal on the ground that it could not be answered. Appeal of Hamilton Pipe Line Co., 65 Wyo. 350, 202 P.2d 184,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1949).

Copy of petition serves as notice to parties not appealing.—

The provisions of this section that each party to the hearing before the commission be furnished a copy of the petition of appeal to the district court by the one appealing would give ample notice of the proceedings before that court to parties not appealing and they would be bound by the result thereof. Appeal of Hamilton Pipe Line Co., 65 Wyo. 350, 202 P.2d 184,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1949).

It was not the intention of the legislature that a rehearing must be sought before an appeal

to the district court is taken by a party dissatisfied with an order of the public service commission. Appeal of Hamilton Pipe Line Co., 65 Wyo. 350, 202 P.2d 184,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1949).

The district court is not authorized to try a rate case anew.

Application of Northern Utils. Co., 70 Wyo. 225, 247 P.2d 767,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1952).

The supreme court is not authorized to try a rate case anew. Application of Northern Utils. Co., 70 Wyo. 225, 247 P.2d 767,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1952).

Scope of review. —

The supreme court need only examine the district court's order confirming an order of the commission to ascertain whether it was in conformity with law and whether the result reached by the commission was supported by any substantial evidence. On these points the burden rests upon the appellants to show that the order of the district court and that of the commission is erroneous and did not reach a just and reasonable result. Application of Northern Utils. Co., 70 Wyo. 225, 247 P.2d 767,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1952).

Certiorari is not appropriate method to review action of districtcourt. —

In view of the plenary jurisdiction of district courts, with common-law power to hold inferior tribunals within the scope of their powers, it would seem that an appeal to the district court from the public service commission should be regarded as a proceeding in the course of the common law, and a writ of certiorari is not an appropriate method to review the action of the district court in such a proceeding. Call v. Afton, 73 Wyo. 271, 278 P.2d 270,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1954).

Jurisdiction to reverse order of commission as contrary tolaw. —

Contention that district court exceeded its jurisdiction in reversing order of public service commission on basis that it was contrary to law was not sustained, since this section expressly gives district court power to so decree. Call v. Afton, 73 Wyo. 271, 278 P.2d 270,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1954).

As to time limitations, Rule 72.1 (d), W.R.C.P., supersedes this section.

Town of Afton v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 471 P.2d 331,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1970). See also Rule 87 (b), W.R.C.P.

Quoted

in

Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 662 P.2d 878,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 312

(Wyo. 1983).

Law reviews. —

See “Scope of Review of Decision of an Administrative Agency in Wyoming,” 9 Wyo. L.J. 65 (1954).

§ 37-2-220.
Process, evidence as in civil actions.

In all actions and proceedings in court arising under this act, all processes shall be served and the practice and rules of evidence shall be the same as in civil actions or in suits in equity, except as otherwise herein provided. Every sheriff or other officer empowered to execute civil process shall execute any process issued under the provisions of this act and shall receive such compensation therefor, as may be prescribed by law for similar services.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 63; C.S. 1920, § 5515; R.S. 1931, § 94-163; C.S. 1945, § 64-322; W.S. 1957, § 37-49.

Cross references. —

As to service of notice concerning matters before the public service commission, see §

37-2-202

.

As to service of process generally, see §§

1-6-101

to

1-6-203

and Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

As to evidence and witnesses generally, see §§

1-12-101

to

1-12-601

and Rule 43, W.R.C.P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915. See note at §

37-2-110

.

§ 37-2-221.
Injunction.

No injunction shall issue suspending or staying any order of the commission, except upon application to the district court in and for the county in which the commission has its principal office, or the presiding judge thereof, or the federal court or judge having jurisdiction there, and upon notice to the commission and hearing.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 64; C.S. 1920, § 5516; R.S. 1931, § 94-164; C.S. 1945, § 64-323; W.S. 1957, § 37-50.

Cross references. —

As to injunctions generally, see §§

1-28-101

to

1-28-111

and Rule 65, W.R.C.P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Adequacy, as regards right to injunction, of other remedy for review of order fixing public utility rates, 8 ALR2d 839.

§ 37-2-222.
Undercharges for electricity and gas; collection permitted; restrictions.

Whenever a public utility supplying gas, natural gas or electricity has undercharged any customer as the result of a meter or metering inaccuracy or other continuing problem under its control, the utility may only bill the customer for the amount of the unmetered gas or electricity rendered in the one hundred eighty-three (183) days immediately prior to the date the utility remedies the meter inaccuracy. The maximum portion of the undercharge for unmetered gas or electricity rendered that may be recovered from the customer in any billing month shall be determined by dividing the amount of the undercharge by twelve (12) and the quotient is the maximum portion of the undercharge that the utility may, subject to subsection (c) of this section, recover from the customer in any billing month, in addition to either regular monthly charges of any type or regular level payment amounts billed in accordance with an agreement between the customer and the utility. Subject to subsection (c) of this section, the time period over which the undercharge may be collected shall be twelve (12) consecutive months.

No utility shall recover any interest charge, service charge or fee, whether or not a percentage is utilized for its computation, for billings made pursuant to this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the customer from paying an undercharge or any portion thereof in a time shorter than that stated in this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a gas, natural gas or electric utility from collecting an undercharge or any portion thereof in a time longer than that stated in this section.

A gas, natural gas or electric utility may not collect any amount otherwise permitted to be collected under this section unless the utility, in the first bill the purpose of which is to collect the amount for unmetered gas or electric service, states the entire amount that it seeks to collect.

No gas, natural gas or electric utility required to follow this section in order to collect an undercharge from a customer may shut off the service of the customer except for safety reasons, except in the event of a request by the customer and except to enforce a shut-off provision in its filed tariffs with the commission that is triggered by nonpayment by a customer of a lawfully owing past due amount.

This section does not apply to any act that is an offense under W.S.

37-12-111

through

37-12-118

, or where a physical act of a customer or its agent causes inaccurate or no recording of the meter reading or inaccurate or no measurement of the gas or electricity rendered.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 56, § 1.